Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 12 Transfer of Prisoners to Federal Penitentiaries

13-12-1.
Authority of attorney general.

The attorney general, when the director of corrections shall certify that proper and adequate treatment, facilities, and personnel are unavailable within this state, shall be authorized to contract with the proper officials (director of Bureau of the Prisons) of the United States for the custody, care, subsistence, education, treatment, and training of persons convicted of criminal offenses in the courts of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 11.

13-12-2.
Reimbursement by state.

Any contract entered into pursuant to §

13-12-1

shall provide for reimbursement to the United States in full for all costs or other expenses involved, or any other amount that may be agreed upon between the state and the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 3, § 1.

13-12-3.
Treatment of prisoners.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in the contract, a person committed pursuant to §

13-12-1

shall be subject to all the provisions of law and regulations applicable to persons committed for violations of law of the United States not inconsistent with the sentence imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 3, § 1.